Tennessee, session 114, SB2276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 5-1-111(e), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (e)(1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (e)(2):
(2) After the redistricting following the 2030 federal census, a county shall not
have a district that encompasses the entire county, and a commissioner shall not be
elected for an at-large district.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 5-1-210(4), is amended by deleting
the subdivision and substituting instead:
(4)
(A) For the size, method of election, qualification for holding office,
method of removal, and procedures of the county legislative body with such other
provisions with respect to such body as are normally related to the organization,
powers, and duties of governing bodies in counties;
(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (4)(A), a member of the county
legislative body shall not represent a district that encompasses the entire county.
This subdivision (4)(B) is remedial in nature, and any county having an at-large
district on the effective date of this act shall amend the charter to comply with this
subdivision (4)(B) no later than the 2030 federal census.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2276
011693
- 1 -